Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.260

Deposit of commodities unfit for human consumption—Notice.

No depositor may knowingly deliver for handling, conditioning, storage, or shipment any commodity treated with an agricultural pesticide or contaminated with filth rendering it unfit for human consumption without first notifying the warehouse operator.

[ 2011 c 336 s 618; 1983 c 305 s 42; 1963 c 124 s 26.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.